New Jersey, session 222, S3451.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  The 2026 FIFA World Cup, taking place in the United States, Canada, and Mexico, and for which MetLife Stadium in East Rutherford, New Jersey, will host a significant number of matches, including the final match, presents an enormous economic and cultural opportunity for this State. b.  However, it is well documented that events such as the 2026 FIFA World Cup pose challenges concerning the health, safety, and welfare of local residents, event-related workers, and international visitors. c.  To that end, as part of the host city selection process for the 2026 FIFA World Cup, the State of New Jersey and the City of New York jointly submitted to FIFA the NY/NJ Human Rights Report in June 2021. d.  The NY/NJ Human Rights Report contains detailed descriptions of commitments from New Jersey and New York City prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup concerning efforts to safeguard human rights, the freedom of expression, and workers rights and labor standards; ensure public safety, diversity, equity, inclusion, disability access, and equal opportunity; prevent human trafficking and discrimination; and encourage fair housing and community engagement. e.  In addition, in June 2024, FIFA published its FIFA World Cup 2026 Human Rights Framework as a guidance document for the implementation of human rights plans by host cities and other local authorities. f.  The effective implementation of the commitments made pursuant to the NY/NJ Human Rights Report by all relevant stakeholders in this State is critical to the success of the 2026 FIFA World Cup events held in this State and to ensure that all residents, workers, and visitors of this State enjoy the benefits of this unprecedented event. 2. a. No later than 1[30 days after the enactment of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill)] the date of the first 2026 FIFA World Cup match scheduled to be held in this State, June 13, 20261, the 1[following entities and State agencies] New York New Jersey 2026 World Cup Host Committee, Inc.1 shall submit an initial report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature concerning the implementation of the human rights stakeholder engagement commitments made pursuant to the updated NY/NJ Human Rights Report submitted to FIFA in December 20211[: (1) the New York New Jersey 2026 World Cup Host Committee, Inc.; (2) the Office of the Governor; (3) the Department of Children and Families; (4) the Department of Community Affairs; (5) the Department of Human Services; (6) the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; (7) the Division on Civil Rights in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (8) the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (9) the Department of Transportation; (10) the Office of Diversity and Inclusion in the Department of the Treasury; (11) the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority; (12) the New Jersey Transit Corporation; (13) the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey; (14) the Department of the Treasury; (15) the Office of the Attorney General; (16) the Department of State; and (17) the New Jersey Commission on Human Trafficking]1. b. The 1[reports] report1 made pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall include, but not be limited to: (1) a survey of actions taken to implement the commitments made pursuant to the NY/NJ Human Rights Report since 2021; (2) an evaluation of the effectiveness of the actions taken to date; and (3) plans for continuing implementation prior to and during the 2026 FIFA World Cup. c. No later than 1[30] 601 days following the final match of the 2026 FIFA World Cup, July 19, 2026, 1[each entity and State agency listed in subsection a. of this section] the New York New Jersey 2026 World Cup Host Committee, Inc.1 shall submit a final report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature providing an update of the initial report made pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  The final report shall include, but not be limited to, an evaluation of the effectiveness of the implementation of the commitments made, and recommendations for further action by the Executive Branch or the Legislature. 1In preparing the final report, the New York New Jersey 2026 World Cup Host Committee, Inc. is authorized to consult with any and all State agencies that participated in the preparation of the 2021 NY/NJ Human Rights Report, and shall consult with, at minimum: (1) the Office of the Governor; (2) the Attorney General; (3) the Division on Civil Rights in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (4) the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety; (5) the New Jersey Transit Corporation; (6) the Department of Labor and Workforce Development; (7) the New Jersey Commission on Human Trafficking; (8) the governing body of every county or municipality, as applicable, designated as a Flag City; and (9) the management of every entity or institution, as applicable, hosting a Team Base Camp.1 1[3.  a.  The governing body of every municipality, with which the New York New Jersey 2026 World Cup Host Committee, Inc. has designated a location as a stadium venue, a Team Base Camp, an Official Fan Zone, or as part of the FIFA Fan Festival for the 2026 FIFA World Cup, shall, no later than 30 days after the enactment of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), or no later than 30 days after such location has been designated, prepare a local human rights plan to manage the impact of the 2026 FIFA World Cup on the municipality. The plan shall be guided by the FIFA World Cup 2026 Human Rights Framework published in June 2024, the NY/NJ Human Rights Report submitted to FIFA, and all applicable federal, State, and local laws concerning human trafficking, worker protection, child protection, anti-discrimination, and freedom of expression.  The plan shall be submitted to the Chief Diversity Officer of the Office of Diversity and Inclusion in the Department of the Treasury, and shall be published on the Internet website of the Office of Diversity and Inclusion and the Internet website of the municipality. b. No later than 30 days following the final match of the 2026 FIFA World Cup, July 19, 2026, each municipality submitting a plan pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall submit a report to the Chief Diversity Officer, the Governor, and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), to the Legislature providing an evaluation of the effectiveness of the implementation of the plan.]1 1[4.]  3.1  This act shall take effect immediately.